California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(3) Any person who is deceased. Probable cause to believe that the death of an individual with a disability resulted from abuse or neglect or any other specific cause is not required for the protection and advocacy agency to obtain access to the records. For the purposes of access pursuant to this paragraph, “person with a disability” includes a person who died in a situation in which services, supports, or other assistance is, or has, customarily been provided to people with disabilities.

(4) Any person who has a guardian, conservator, limited conservator, or other legal representative with respect to whom a complaint has been received by the protection and advocacy agency, or with respect to whom the protection and advocacy agency has determined that probable
 cause exists to believe that the person has been or may be subjected to abuse or neglect, whenever all of the following conditions exist:

(A) The protection and advocacy agency made a good faith effort to contact the guardian, conservator, limited conservator, or other legal representative upon prompt receipt of the representative’s contact information, which shall include, but not be limited to, the representative’s name, address, telephone number, and email address.

(B) The protection and advocacy agency has offered assistance to the representatives to resolve the situation.

(C) The representative has failed or refused to consent on behalf of the person.

(5) Any other person with a disability under the circumstances described in subdivision (a) of Section 4902.

(b) Individual records that shall be available to the protection and advocacy agency under this division, whether written or in another medium, draft, preliminary, or final, including, but not limited to, handwritten notes, electronic files, photographs, videotapes, or audiotapes, shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Information and records prepared or received in the course of providing intake, assessment, evaluation, education, training, or other services, supports, or assistance, including, but not limited to, medical records, financial records, monitoring reports, or other reports, prepared or received by a member of the staff of a
 facility, program, or service provider. This includes records stored or maintained at sites other than that of the facility, program, or service provider and records that were not prepared by the facility, program, or service provider, but received by the facility, program, or service provider.

(2) Reports prepared by a federal, state, or local governmental agency or a private organization charged with investigating reports of incidents of abuse, neglect, injury, or death. The organizations whose reports are subject to this requirement include, but are not limited to, agencies in the foster care system, disabilities systems, prison and jail systems, facilities used to house or detain persons for purposes of civil immigration proceedings, public and private educational systems, emergency shelters, criminal and civil law enforcement
 agencies such as police departments, agencies overseeing juvenile justice facilities, juvenile detention facilities, all preadjudication and postadjudication juvenile facilities, state and federal licensing and certification agencies, and private accreditation organizations such as the Joint Commission on the Accreditation of Healthcare Organizations or by medical care evaluation or peer review committees, regardless of whether they are protected by state law. The reports subject to this requirement
 describe any or all of the following:

(A) Abuse, neglect, injury, or death.

(B) The steps taken to investigate the incidents.

(C) Reports and records, including, but not limited to, personnel records prepared or maintained by the facility, program, or service provider in connection with reports of incidents, subject to the following:

(i) If a state statute specifies procedures with respect to personnel records, the protection and advocacy agency shall follow those procedures.

(ii) Personnel records shall be protected from disclosure in compliance with the fundamental right of
 privacy established pursuant to Section 1 of Article I of the California Constitution. The custodian of personnel records shall have a right and a duty to resist attempts to allow the unauthorized disclosure of personnel records, and may not waive the privacy rights that are guaranteed pursuant to Section 1 of Article I of the California Constitution.

(D) Supporting information that was relied upon in creating a report, including, but not limited to, all information and records that document interviews with persons who were interviewed, physical and documentary evidence that was reviewed, or related investigative findings.

(3) Discharge planning records.

(c) Information in the possession of a program, facility, or service
 provider that must be available to the agency investigating instances of abuse or neglect pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4902, whether written or in another medium, draft, preliminary, or final, including, but not limited to, handwritten notes, electronic files, photographs, videotapes, audiotapes, or records, shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Information in reports prepared by individuals and entities performing certification or licensure reviews, or by professional accreditation organizations, as well as related assessments prepared for a program, facility, or service provider by its staff, contractors, or related entities, including peer review committees.

(2) Information in professional, performance, building, or other safety standards, or
 demographic and statistical information, relating to the facility, program, or service provider.

(d) The authority of the protection and advocacy agency to have access to records does not supersede any prohibition on discovery specified in Sections 1157 and 1157.6 of the Evidence Code, nor does it supersede any prohibition on disclosure subject to the physician-patient privilege or the psychotherapist-patient privilege.

(e) An educational agency, including, but not limited to, public, private, and charter schools and public and private residential and nonresidential schools, shall provide the protection and advocacy agency with the name and contact information for the parent or guardian of a student for whom the protection and advocacy agency has authority to access, inspect, and copy
 records.

(f) (1) The protection and advocacy agency shall have access to records of individuals described in subdivision (a) of Section 4902 and in subdivision (a), and other records that are relevant to conducting an investigation, under the circumstances described in those subdivisions, not later than three business days after the agency makes a written request for the records involved.

(2) The protection and advocacy agency shall have immediate access to the records, including the right to inspect and copy the records, as described in subdivision (g), not later than 24 hours after the agency makes a request, without consent from another party, in a situation in which treatment, services, supports, or other assistance is provided to an individual with a
 disability, if the agency determines that the health or safety of the individual is in serious and immediate jeopardy, or in a case of the death of an individual with a disability.

(3) If the protection and advocacy agency’s access to records is denied or delayed beyond the deadlines specified in paragraphs (1) and (2), the protection and advocacy agency shall, within two business days after the expiration of the deadline, be provided with a written statement of reasons for the denial or delay. In the case of a denial for alleged lack of authorization, the name, address, and telephone number of the guardian, conservator, limited conservator, or other legal representative of the individual with a disability shall be included in the statement.

(g) A protection and advocacy agency
 shall be permitted to inspect and copy information and records, subject to a reasonable charge to offset duplicating costs. If the facility, program, or service provider or its agents copy the records for the protection and advocacy agency, it shall not charge the protection and advocacy agency an amount that would exceed the amount authorized by the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) for reproducing documents. The protection and advocacy agency may make written notes when inspecting information and records, and may use its own photocopying equipment to obtain copies. For state-operated mental health facilities, the protection and advocacy agency may not use equipment or devices otherwise restricted in the facilities when copying records in a portion of the facility where the restriction applies. If a party other than the
 protection and advocacy agency performs the photocopying or other reproduction of records, it shall provide the photocopies or reproductions to the protection and advocacy agency within the timeframes specified in subdivision (f). In addition, if records are kept or maintained electronically, they shall be provided to the protection and advocacy agency electronically.

(h) (1) Confidential information kept or obtained by the protection and advocacy agency shall remain confidential and is not subject to disclosure.

(2) The protection and advocacy agency shall obtain written consent from the following individuals, as applicable, before releasing information concerning them to a person not otherwise authorized to receive it:

(A) An individual with a disability, a client, or the individual’s or client’s guardian, conservator, limited conservator, or other legal representative.

(B) An individual who has been provided general information or technical assistance on a particular matter.

(C) An individual who furnishes reports or information that form the basis for a determination of probable cause that an individual has been or may be subject to abuse or neglect, or is in serious and immediate jeopardy.

(3) This subdivision shall not, however, prevent the protection and advocacy agency from doing any of the following:

(A) Sharing the information with the individual client who is the subject of the record or report or other document, or with the client’s legally authorized representative, subject to any limitation on disclosure to recipients of mental health services as provided in subsection (b) of Section 10806 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(B) Issuing a public report of the results of an investigation that maintains the confidentiality of individual service recipients.

(C) Reporting the results of an investigation to responsible investigative or enforcement agencies in a manner that maintains the confidentiality of the individuals should an investigation reveal information concerning the facility, program, or service provider, or their staff or employees warranting possible
 sanctions or corrective action. The information may be reported to agencies that are responsible for facility, program, or service provider licensing or accreditation, employee discipline, employee licensing or certification suspension or revocation, or criminal investigation or prosecution.

(D) Pursuing alternative remedies, including the initiation of legal action.

(E) Reporting suspected elder or dependent adult abuse pursuant to the Elder Abuse and Dependent Adult Civil Protection Act (Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 15600) of Part 3 of Division 9).

(4) Notwithstanding the confidentiality requirements of this section, the protection and advocacy agency may make a report to investigative or
 enforcement agencies that reveals the identity of an individual with a disability, and information relating to their status or treatment in any of the following situations:

(A) When the agency has received a complaint that the individual has been or may be subject to abuse and neglect, or has probable cause to believe that the individual has been or may be subject to abuse or neglect.

(B) When the protection and advocacy agency determines that the health or safety of the individual is in serious and immediate jeopardy.

(C) In the case of the death of an individual whom the protection and advocacy agency believes may have had a disability.

(i) The protection
 and advocacy agency shall inform and train employees as appropriate regarding the confidentiality of client records.

(j) The authority provided pursuant to subdivision (b) shall
 include access to all of the following:

(1) An unredacted facility evaluation report form or an unredacted complaint investigation report form of the State Department of Social Services. This information shall remain confidential and subject to the confidentiality requirements of subdivision (h).

(2) An unredacted citation report, unredacted licensing report, unredacted survey report, unredacted plan of correction, or unredacted statement of deficiency of the State Department of Public Health, prepared by authorized licensing personnel or authorized representatives as described in subdivision (a) of Section 5328.15. The information shall remain confidential and subject to the confidentiality requirements of subdivision (h).

(k) Notwithstanding any other state law governing patient privacy, the sharing of health information and records with a protection and advocacy agency is permitted to the extent that the sharing is required by law and complies with the requirements of that law. The Legislature finds and declares that the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 privacy rule permits the disclosure of protected health information to a protection and advocacy agency, without the authorization of the individual who is the subject of the protected health information, to the extent that the disclosure is required by law and the disclosure complies with the requirements of that law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 436.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

4904.

(a) The protection and advocacy agency, its employees, and designated agents, shall not be liable for an injury resulting from an employee’s or agent’s act or omission where the act or omission was the result of the exercise, in good faith, of the discretion vested in him or her. 

(b) The protection and advocacy agency, its employees, and designated agents, shall not be liable for damages awarded under Section 3294 of the Civil Code or other damages imposed primarily for the sake of example and by way of punishing the defendant. 

(c) The protection and advocacy agency, its employees, and designated agents, when participating in filing a complaint or providing information pursuant to this division or participating in a judicial proceeding resulting therefrom shall be presumed to be acting in good faith and unless the presumption is rebutted, shall be immune from any liability, civil or criminal, and shall be immune from any penalty, sanction, or restriction that might be incurred or imposed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 534, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

4905.

(a) No employee or agent of a facility, program, or service shall subject a person with a disability to reprisal or harassment or directly or indirectly take or threaten to take any action that would prevent the person, his or her legally authorized representative, or family member from reporting or otherwise bringing to the attention of the protection and advocacy agency any facts or information relative to suspected abuse, neglect, or other violations of the person’s rights.

(b) Any attempt to involuntarily remove from a facility, program, or service, or to deny privileges or rights without good cause to a person with a disability by whom or for whom a complaint has been made to the protection and advocacy agency, within 60 days after the date the complaint is made or within 60 days after the conclusion of any proceeding resulting from the complaint, shall raise a presumption that the action was taken in retaliation for the filing of the complaint.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 878, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

4906.

(a) The protection and advocacy agency may not obtain access through the use of physical force to facilities, programs, service recipients, residents, or records required by the division if this access is delayed or denied.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), nothing in this division is intended to preclude the protection and advocacy agency from pursuing appropriate legal remedies to enforce its access authority under this division or applicable federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 878, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 5. COMMUNITY MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES [5000. - 5987.]



PART 1. THE LANTERMAN-PETRIS-SHORT ACT [5000. - 5550.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [5000. - 5122.]

5000.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the Lanterman-Petris-Short Act.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

5001.

The provisions of this part and Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 5585) shall be construed to promote the legislative intent as follows:

(a) To end the inappropriate, indefinite, and involuntary commitment of persons with mental health disorders, developmental disabilities, and chronic alcoholism, and to eliminate legal disabilities.

(b) To provide prompt evaluation and treatment of persons with mental health disorders or impaired by chronic alcoholism.

(c) To guarantee and protect public safety.

(d) To safeguard individual rights through judicial review.

(e) To provide individualized treatment, supervision, and placement services by a conservatorship program for persons who are gravely disabled.

(f) To encourage the full use of all existing agencies, professional personnel, and public funds to accomplish these objectives and to prevent duplication of services and unnecessary expenditures.

(g) To protect persons with mental health disorders and developmental disabilities from criminal acts.

(h) To provide consistent standards for protection of the personal rights of persons receiving services under this part and under Part 1.5 (commencing
 with Section 5585).

(i) To provide services in the least restrictive setting appropriate to the needs of each person receiving services under this part and under Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 5585).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 567, Sec. 1.   (SB 364)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

5002.

(a) Persons with mental health disorders and persons impaired by chronic alcoholism may no longer be judicially committed.

(b) Persons with mental health disorders shall receive services pursuant to this part. Persons impaired by chronic alcoholism may receive services pursuant to this part if they elect to do so pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 5225) of Chapter 2.

(c) Persons with epilepsy may no longer be judicially committed.

(d) This part shall not be construed to repeal or modify laws relating to the commitment of mentally disordered sex offenders, persons with an intellectual disability, and mentally disordered criminal
 offenders, except as specifically provided in Section 4011.6 of the Penal Code, or as specifically provided in other statutes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 84.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

5003.

Nothing in this part shall be construed in any way as limiting the right of any person to make voluntary application at any time to any public or private agency or practitioner for mental health services, either by direct application in person, or by referral from any other public or private agency or practitioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

5004.

Persons with mental health disorders and persons with developmental disabilities shall receive protection from criminal acts equal to that provided any other resident in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 85.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

5004.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a legal guardian, conservator, or other person who reasonably believes a person with a mental health disorder or developmental disability is the victim of a crime may file a report with an appropriate law enforcement agency. The report shall specify the nature of the alleged offense and any pertinent evidence. Notwithstanding any other law, the information in that report shall not be deemed confidential in any manner. No person shall incur any civil or criminal liability as a result of making a report authorized by this section unless it can be shown that a false report was made and the person knew or should have known that the report was false.

(b) Where the district attorney of the county
 in which the alleged offense occurred finds, based upon the evidence contained in the report and any other evidence obtained through regular investigatory procedures, that a reasonable probability exists that a crime or public offense has been committed and that the person with the mental health disorder or developmental disability is the victim, the district attorney may file a complaint verified on information and belief.

(c) The filing of a report by a legal guardian, conservator, or any other person pursuant to this section shall not constitute evidence that a crime or public offense has been committed and shall not be considered in any manner by the trier of fact.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 86.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

5005.

Unless specifically stated, a person complained against in any petition or proceeding initiated by virtue of the provisions of this part shall not forfeit any legal right or suffer legal disability by reason of the provisions of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

5006.

The provisions of this part shall not be construed to deny treatment by spiritual means through prayer in accordance with the tenets and practices of a recognized church or denomination for any person detained for evaluation or treatment who desires such treatment, or to a minor if his parent, guardian, or conservator desires such treatment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

5007.

Unless otherwise indicated, the provisions of this part shall not be construed to apply retroactively to terminate court commitments of mentally ill persons or inebriates under preexisting law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

5008.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions shall govern the construction of this part:

(a) “Evaluation” consists of multidisciplinary professional analyses of a person’s medical, psychological, educational, social, financial, and legal conditions as may appear to constitute a problem. Persons providing evaluation services shall be properly qualified professionals and may be full-time employees of an agency providing face-to-face, which includes telehealth, evaluation services or may be part-time employees or may be employed on a contractual basis.

(b) “Court-ordered evaluation” means an evaluation ordered by a superior
 court pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 5200) of Chapter 2 or by a superior court pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 5225) of Chapter 2.

(c) “Intensive treatment” consists of such hospital and other services as may be indicated. Intensive treatment shall be provided by properly qualified professionals and carried out in facilities qualifying for reimbursement under the California Medical Assistance Program (Medi-Cal) set forth in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3 of Division 9, or under Title XVIII of the federal Social Security Act and regulations thereunder. Intensive treatment may be provided in hospitals of the United States government by properly qualified professionals. This part does not prohibit an intensive treatment facility from also providing 72-hour evaluation and treatment.

(d) “Referral” is referral of persons by each agency or facility
 providing assessment, evaluation, crisis intervention, or treatment services to other agencies or individuals. The purpose of referral shall be to provide for continuity of care, and may include, but need not be limited to, informing the person of available services, making appointments on the person’s behalf, discussing the person’s problem with the agency or individual to which the person has been referred, appraising the outcome of referrals, and arranging for personal escort and transportation when necessary. Referral shall be considered complete when the agency or individual to whom the person has been referred accepts responsibility for providing the necessary services. All persons shall be advised of available precare services that prevent initial recourse to hospital treatment or aftercare services that support adjustment to community living following hospital treatment. These
 services may be provided through county or city mental health departments, state hospitals under the jurisdiction of the
 State Department of State Hospitals, regional centers under contract with the State Department of Developmental Services, or other public or private entities.

Each agency or facility providing evaluation services shall maintain a current and comprehensive file of all community services, both public and private. These files shall contain current agreements with agencies or individuals accepting referrals, as well as appraisals of the results of past referrals.

(e) “Crisis intervention” consists of an interview or series of interviews within a brief period of time, conducted by qualified professionals, and designed to alleviate personal or family situations that present a serious and imminent threat to the health or stability of the person or the family. The interview or interviews may
 be conducted in the home of the person or family, or on an inpatient or outpatient basis with such therapy, or other services, as may be appropriate. The interview or interviews may include family members, significant support persons, providers, or other entities or individuals, as appropriate and as authorized by law. Crisis intervention may, as appropriate, include suicide prevention, psychiatric, welfare, psychological, legal, or other social services.

(f) “Prepetition screening” is a screening of all petitions for court-ordered evaluation as provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 5200) of Chapter 2, consisting of a professional review of all petitions; an interview with the petitioner and, whenever possible, the person alleged, as a result of a mental health disorder, to be a danger to others, or to themselves, or to be gravely disabled,
 to assess the problem and explain the petition; when indicated, efforts to persuade the person to receive, on a voluntary basis, comprehensive evaluation, crisis intervention, referral, and other services specified in this part.

(g) “Conservatorship investigation” means investigation by an agency appointed or designated by the governing body of cases in which conservatorship is recommended pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5350).

(h) (1) For purposes of Article 1 (commencing with Section 5150), Article 2 (commencing with Section 5200), Article 3 (commencing with Section 5225), and Article 4 (commencing with Section 5250) of Chapter 2, and for purposes of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5350), “gravely disabled” means any of the following, as
 applicable:

(A) A condition in which a person, as a result of a mental health disorder, a severe substance use disorder, or a co-occurring mental health disorder and a severe substance use disorder, is unable to provide for their basic personal needs for food, clothing, shelter, personal safety, or necessary medical care.

(B) A condition in which a person has been found mentally incompetent under Section 1370 of the Penal Code and all of the following facts exist:

(i) The complaint, indictment, or information pending against the person at the time of commitment charges a felony involving death, great bodily harm, or a serious threat to the physical well-being of another person.

(ii) There has been a finding of probable cause on a complaint pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1368.1 of the Penal Code, a preliminary examination pursuant to Section 859b of the Penal Code, or a grand jury indictment, and the complaint, indictment, or information has not been dismissed.

(iii) As a result of a mental health disorder, the person is unable to understand the nature and purpose of the proceedings taken against them and to assist counsel in the conduct of their defense in a rational manner.

(iv) The person represents a substantial danger of physical harm to others by reason of a mental disease, defect, or disorder.

(2) For purposes of Article 3 (commencing with Section 5225) and
 Article 4 (commencing with Section 5250), of Chapter 2, and for purposes of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5350), “gravely disabled” includes a condition in which a person, as a result of impairment by chronic alcoholism, is unable to provide for their basic personal needs for food, clothing, shelter, personal safety, or necessary medical care.

(3) The term “gravely disabled” does not include persons with intellectual disabilities by reason of that disability alone.

(4) A county, by adoption of a resolution of its governing body, may elect to defer implementation of the changes made to this section by Senate Bill 43 of the 2023–24 Regular Session of the Legislature until January 1, 2026.

(i) “Peace officer” means a
 duly sworn peace officer as that term is defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code who has completed the basic training course established by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training, or any parole officer or probation officer specified in Section 830.5 of the Penal Code when acting in relation to cases for which the officer has a legally mandated responsibility.

(j) “Postcertification treatment” means an additional period of treatment pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 5300) of Chapter 2.

(k) “Court,” unless otherwise specified, means a court of record.

(l) “Antipsychotic medication” means any medication customarily prescribed for the treatment
 of symptoms of psychoses and other severe mental and emotional disorders.

(m) “Emergency” means a situation in which action to impose treatment over the person’s objection is immediately necessary for the preservation of life or the prevention of serious bodily harm to the patient or others, and it is impracticable to first gain consent. It is not necessary for harm to take place or become unavoidable prior to treatment.

(n) (1) “Designated facility,” “facility designated by the county for evaluation and treatment,” or “facility designated by the county to provide intensive treatment” means a facility that meets designation requirements duly established by the State Department of Health Care Services in accordance with Section 5404, including, but
 not limited to, the following:

(A) Psychiatric health facilities licensed by the State Department of Health Care Services.

(B) Psychiatric residential treatment facilities licensed by the State Department of Health Care Services.

(C) Mental health rehabilitation centers licensed by the State Department of Health Care Services.

(D) Provider sites certified by the State Department of Health Care Services or a mental health plan to provide crisis stabilization.

(E) General acute care hospitals licensed by the State Department of Public Health.

(F) Acute psychiatric hospitals licensed by the State Department of Public Health.

(G) Chemical dependency recovery hospitals licensed by the State Department of Public Health.

(H) Hospitals operated by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs. 

(2) (A) A county may designate a facility for the purpose of providing one or more of the following services:

(i) Providing evaluation and treatment pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 5150) of Chapter 2.

(ii) Providing intensive treatment pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 5250) of Chapter
 2.

(iii) Providing additional intensive treatment pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 5260) of Chapter 2.

(iv) Providing additional intensive treatment pursuant to Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 5270.10) of Chapter 2.

(v) Providing postcertification treatment pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 5300) of Chapter 2.

(B) A county may designate a facility, as is appropriate and based on capability, for the purpose of providing one or more types of treatment listed in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (n) without designating the facility to provide all treatments.

(3) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the State Department of Health Care Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this subdivision, in whole or in part, by means of plan or county letters, information notices, plan or provider bulletins, or other similar instructions, until the time regulations are adopted no later than December 31, 2027.

(o) “Severe substance use disorder” means a diagnosed substance-related disorder that meets the diagnostic criteria of “severe” as defined in the most current version of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders.

(p) “Personal safety” means the ability of one to survive safely in the community without involuntary detention or
 treatment pursuant to this part.

(q) “Necessary medical care” means care that a licensed health care practitioner, while operating within the scope of their practice, determines to be necessary to prevent serious deterioration of an existing physical medical condition that, if left untreated, is likely to result in serious bodily injury as defined in Section 15610.67.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 644, Sec. 5.   (SB 1238)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5008.1.

As used in this division and in Division 4 (commencing with Section 4000), Division 4.1 (commencing with Section 4400), Division 6 (commencing with Section 6000), Division 7 (commencing with Section 7100), and Division 8 (commencing with Section 8000), the term “judicially committed” means all of the following:

(a) Persons who are mentally disordered sex offenders placed in a state hospital or institutional unit for observation or committed to the State Department of State Hospitals pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 6300) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 6.

(b) Developmentally disabled persons who are admitted to a state
 hospital upon application or who are committed to the State Department of Developmental Services by court order pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 6.

(c) Persons committed to the State Department of State Hospitals or a state hospital pursuant to the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 124.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5008.2.

(a) When applying the definition of mental disorder for the purposes of Articles 2 (commencing with Section 5200), 4 (commencing with Section 5250), and 5 (commencing with Section 5275) of Chapter 2 and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5350), the historical course of the person’s mental disorder, as determined by available relevant information about the course of the person’s mental disorder, shall be considered when it has a direct bearing on the determination of whether the person is a danger to others, or to himself or herself, or is gravely disabled, as a result of a mental disorder. The historical course shall include, but is not limited to, evidence presented by persons who have provided, or are providing, mental health or related support services to the patient, the patient’s medical records as presented to the court, including psychiatric records, or evidence voluntarily presented by family members, the patient, or any other person designated by the patient. Facilities shall make every reasonable effort to make information provided by the patient’s family available to the court. The hearing officer, court, or jury shall exclude from consideration evidence it determines to be irrelevant because of remoteness of time or dissimilarity of circumstances.

(b) This section shall not be applied to limit the application of Section 5328 or to limit existing rights of a patient to respond to evidence presented to the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 506, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5009.

Persons receiving evaluation or treatment under this part shall be given a choice of physician or other professional person providing such services, in accordance with the policies of each agency providing services, and within the limits of available staff in the agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

5010.

The agency established in this state to fulfill the requirements and assurances of Section 142 of the federal Developmental Disabilities Act of 1984 for a system to protect and advocate the rights of persons with developmental disabilities, as that term is defined by Section 102(7) of the federal act, shall have access to the records of a person with developmental disabilities who resides in a facility for persons with developmental disabilities when both of the following conditions apply:

(1) The agency has received a complaint from or on behalf of the person and the person consents to the disclosure of the records to the extent of his or her capabilities.

(2) The person does not have a parent, guardian or conservator, or the state or the designee of the state is the person’s guardian or conservator.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1121, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5012.

The fact that a person has been taken into custody under this part may not be used in the determination of that person’s eligibility for payment or reimbursement for mental health or other health care services for which he or she has applied or received under the Medi-Cal program, any health care service plan licensed under the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code), or any insurer providing health coverage doing business in the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 506, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5013.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that referrals between facilities, providers, and other organizations shall be facilitated by the sharing of information and records in accordance with Section 5328 and applicable federal and state laws.
